Missouri, session 2026, HB3218.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.243, 115.449, 115.461, 115.511, and 128.010, RSMo, are
repealed and six new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 115.243,
115.449, 115.461, 115.511, 128.010, and 128.075, to read as follows:
115.243. 1. For the purposes of this chapter, the candidates for president and vice
president of the United States from any political party or group of petitioners shall be
considered one candidate. The names of the candidates for president and vice president from
each political party or group of petitioners shall be enclosed in a brace directly to the left of
the names in the appropriate column on the official ballot. Directly to the left of each brace
shall be printed one square, the sides of which are not less than one-fourth inch in length. The
names of candidates for presidential electors shall not be printed on the ballot but shall be
filed with the secretary of state in the manner provided in section 115.399.
2. A vote for any candidate for president and vice president on the official ballot
shall be a vote for [their electors] each of the candidates for elector filed under section
115.399.
3. When presidential and vice-presidential candidates are to be elected, the following
instruction shall be printed on the official ballot: "A vote for candidates for President and
Vice President is a vote for [their electors] each of the candidates for elector.".
115.449. 1. As soon as the polls close in each polling place using paper ballots, the
election judges shall begin to count the votes. If earlier counting is begun pursuant to section
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3218 2
115.451, the election judges shall complete the count in the manner provided by this section.
Once begun, no count shall be adjourned or postponed until all proper votes have been
counted.
2. One counting judge, closely observed by the other counting judge, shall take the
ballots out of the ballot box one at a time and, holding each ballot in such a way that the other
counting judge may read it, shall read the name of each candidate properly voted for and the
office sought by each. As each vote is called out, the recording judges shall each record the
vote on a tally sheet. The votes for and against all questions shall likewise be read and
recorded. If more than one political subdivision or special district is holding an election on
the same day at the same polling place and using separate ballots, the counting judges may
separate the ballots of each political subdivision and special district and first read one set,
then the next and so on until all proper votes have been counted.
3. After the recording of all proper votes, the recording judges shall compare their
tallies. When the recording judges agree on the count, they shall sign both of the tally sheets,
and one of the recording judges shall announce in a loud voice the total number of votes for
each candidate and for and against each question.
4. After the announcement of the vote, the election judges shall record the vote totals
in the appropriate places on each statement of returns. If any tally sheet or statement of
returns contains no heading for any question, the election judges shall write the necessary
headings on the tally sheet or statement of returns.
5. In the recording of votes for elector of president and vice president, each
candidate for elector shall be recorded as having received the number of votes recorded
as being cast for the associated candidates for president and vice president as filed
under section 115.399.
115.461. 1. The tally book for each polling place using paper ballots shall be in
substantially the following form:
Tally book for ______ precincts, at the general (special, primary)
election held on the ______ day of ______, 20______ AB, CD, EF, and
XP judges, and ZR and LT, watchers and BH and SP challengers at this
polling place, were sworn as the law directs before beginning their
duties.
We hereby certify:
The number of ballots received at this polling place is ______;
The information on the official ballots received at this polling
place is the same as the information on the sample ballots received
at this polling place.
AB

HB 3218 3
CD Election Judges
EF
XP
We hereby certify:
The number of ballots cast at this polling place is ______;
The number of identification certificates signed at this polling
place is ______;
The number of rejected ballots at this polling place is ______;
The number of spoiled ballots at this polling place is ______;
The number of ballots received at this polling place which were
not cast at this election is ______;
AB
CD
EF
XP
2. At each polling place using paper ballots, two tally sheets shall be included in each
tally book. The tally sheets shall be in substantially the following form:
NAMES OF PERSONS VOTED FOR AND
FOR WHAT OFFICE AND THE NUMBER
OF VOTES CAST FOR EACH PERSON
Office Candidates Tally of Votes Total Votes
MC
Governor HK
EH
Representative SS
in RK
Congress CB
VOTES FOR AND AGAINST EACH QUESTION
Question Tally of Total of
Tally of votes votes votes FOR Total of votes
FOR AGAINST AGAINST
1. To_____
______
______
2. To_____
______

HB 3218 4
_______________ _______________
Signature of Recording Signature of Recording
Judge Judge
(of different political
party)
3. At each polling place using paper ballots, two statements of returns shall be
provided to the election judges. The statements of returns shall be in substantially the
following form:
We hereby certify that MC had ______ votes for governor, and HK had
______ votes for governor and EH had ______ votes for governor; that
SS had ______ votes for representative in Congress, etc.
We hereby certify that proposition number 1 received ______ votes for
and ______ votes against; constitutional amendment number 1
received ______ votes for and ______ votes against, etc.
We, the duly qualified and acting Judges of the polling place for _____
_ precincts, at the general (special, primary) election held on the _____
_ of ______, 20______, in ______ county (City of St. Louis, Kansas
City), Missouri do hereby certify that the foregoing is a full and
accurate return of all votes cast at this polling place for all candidates
and for and against all questions.
AB
CD Election Judges
EF
XP
4. In years in which electors for president and vice president are to be elected,
the tally sheets in subsection 2 of this section and statement of returns in subsection 3 of
this section shall record for each candidate for elector the number of votes recorded as
cast for the associated candidates for president and vice president as filed under section
115.399.
115.511. 1. The secretary of state shall convene the board of state canvassers to total
the abstracts of each primary election and the board shall, not later than two weeks after
receiving all required abstracts from the primary election, issue a statement announcing the
results of the primary election for federal officers, governor, lieutenant governor, state
senators and representatives, circuit judges, secretary of state, attorney general, state treasurer
and state auditor.

HB 3218 5
2. The secretary of state shall convene the board of state canvassers to total the
abstracts of each general election and the board shall, not later than the second Tuesday in
December following the general election, issue a statement announcing the results of the
general election for federal officers, governor, lieutenant governor, state senators and
representatives, circuit judges, appellate and circuit judges subject to the provisions of Article
V, Section 25 of the State Constitution, secretary of state, attorney general, state treasurer and
state auditor.
3. The secretary of state shall convene the board of state canvassers to total the
abstracts of each special election at which the name of a candidate for nomination or election
to the office of United States senator, representative in Congress, governor, lieutenant
governor, state senator, state representative, circuit judge not subject to the provisions of
Article V, Section 25 of the State Constitution, secretary of state, attorney general, state
treasurer or state auditor, or at which an initiative, referendum or constitutional amendment
appears on the ballot, and the board shall, not later than two weeks after receiving all required
abstracts from the election, issue a statement announcing the results of the election for such
office or on such question.
4. In issuing a statement announcing the results of an election for elector of
president and vice president of the United States, the board shall announce each
candidate for elector as receiving a number of votes equal to those cast on the official
ballot for the elector's associated candidates for president and vice president as filed
under section 115.399. The board shall announce candidates for president and vice
president as receiving a vote total equal to the aggregate votes of all candidates for
elector associated with president and vice president as filed under section 115.399. No
other vote total shall be announced by the board for any candidate for president and
vice president.
128.010. Hereafter, at all elections held in this state for the offices of president and
vice president of the United States and for elector of president and vice president, the
electoral district shall be the same as the congressional districts into which the state shall be
divided, and the same number of electors as there may be districts shall be chosen by the
qualified voters, one of whom shall be a resident of each district; and in addition thereto, two
electors shall be chosen [by the state at large] irrespective of district residence.
128.075. As soon as practicable and no later than six days before the date of the
meeting of electors, the governor shall send a certificate of ascertainment of
appointment of electors to the Archivist of the United States. The certificate shall
state the names of the electors and the number of votes each candidate for elector
received under section 115.243. The governor shall aggregate the votes received by each
candidate for elector with each other candidate for elector nominated by the same party

HB 3218 6
and report of the certificate of ascertainment the aggregate total of each group of
electors as the total number of votes received by each presidential and vice presidential
candidate. No other vote total for president and vice president shall be reported on the
certificate of ascertainment.
✔